Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201658-857
Nebraska Health Education Assistance Loan Program; established.

There is hereby established, in accordance with Public Law
94-484, the Nebraska Health Education Assistance Loan Program, to be financed
by the authority in the manner provided in the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance
Authority Act.

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 7;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2954;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 54;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1754;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 57.